test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-hirnma85_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `hirnma: # Verb (85) `hirnma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     hirnma+V+Inf/mA: hirnma
     hirnma+V+Inf: hirnuq
     hirnma+V+Act+PrfPrc: hirnnuq
     hirnma+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [hirnut, hirnutu]

     hirnma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hirnu
     hirnma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [hirnut, hirnudõq]
     hirnma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hirn
     hirnma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: hirnumiq
     hirnma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: hirnutiq
     hirnma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: hirnvaq
     hirnma+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: hirnu
     hirnma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [hirni, hirnõ, hirnsõ]
     hirnma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [hirnit, hirnidõq, hirnõt, hirnõdõq, hirnsõt, hirnsõdõq, hirnõq, hirniq, hirnsõq]
     hirnma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [hirnʼ, hirnõ, hirnsõ]
     hirnma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [hirnimiq, hirnõmiq, hirnsõmiq]
     hirnma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [hirnitiq, hirnõtiq, hirnsõtiq]
     hirnma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [hirniq, hirnivaq, hirnõq, hirnõvaq, hirnsõq, hirnsõvaq]

     hirnma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hirnutas

     hirnma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: hirnõv

     hirnma+V+Jus: hirnkuq
